Illinois, session 104th, HB1058.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Prevailing Wage Act is amended by changing 5Section 11 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 130/11)  (from Ch. 48, par. 39s-11)7    Sec. 11. No public works project shall be instituted 8unless the provisions of this Act have been complied with. The 9provisions of this Act shall not be applicable to Federal 10construction projects which require a prevailing wage 11determination by the United States Secretary of Labor. The 12Illinois Department of Labor represented by the Attorney 13General is empowered to sue for injunctive relief against the 14awarding of any contract or the continuation of work under any 15contract for public works at a time when the prevailing wage 16prerequisites have not been met. Any contract for public works 17awarded at a time when the prevailing wage prerequisites had 18not been met shall be void as against public policy and the 19contractor is prohibited from recovering any damages for the 20voiding of the contract or pursuant to the terms of the 21contract. The contractor is limited to a claim for amounts 22actually paid for labor and materials supplied to the public 23body. Where objections to a determination of the prevailing   HB1058- 2 -LRB104 03158 SPS 13179 b1rate of wages or a court action relative thereto is pending, 2the public body shall not continue work on the project unless 3sufficient funds are available to pay increased wages if such 4are finally determined or unless the Department of Labor 5certifies such determination of the prevailing rate of wages 6as correct.7    Any laborer, worker or mechanic employed by the contractor 8or by any sub-contractor under him who is paid for his services 9in a sum less than the prevailing rates for work done under 10such contract, shall have a right of action for whatever 11difference there may be between the amount so paid, and the 12rates provided by the contract together with costs and such 13reasonable attorney's fees as shall be allowed by the court. 14Such contractor or subcontractor shall also be liable to the 15Department of Labor for 20% of such underpayments and shall be 16additionally liable to the laborer, worker or mechanic for 17punitive damages in the amount of 2% of the amount of any such 18penalty to the State for underpayments for each month 19following the date of payment during which such underpayments 20remain unpaid. Where a second or subsequent action to recover 21underpayments is brought against a contractor or subcontractor 22and the contractor or subcontractor is found liable for 23underpayments to any laborer, worker, or mechanic, the 24contractor or subcontractor shall also be liable to the 25Department of Labor for 50% of the underpayments payable as a 26result of the second or subsequent action, and shall be   HB1058- 3 -LRB104 03158 SPS 13179 b1additionally liable for 5% of the amount of any such penalty to 2the State for underpayments for each month following the date 3of payment during which the underpayments remain unpaid. The 4Department shall also have a right of action on behalf of any 5individual who has a right of action under this Section. An 6action brought to recover same shall be deemed to be a suit for 7wages, and any and all judgments entered therein shall have 8the same force and effect as other judgments for wages. The 9action shall be brought within 5 years from the date of the 10failure to pay the wages or compensation. At the request of any 11laborer, workman or mechanic employed by the contractor or by 12any subcontractor under him who is paid less than the 13prevailing wage rate required by this Act, the Department of 14Labor may take an assignment of such wage claim in trust for 15the assigning laborer, workman or mechanic and may bring any 16legal action necessary to collect such claim, and the 17contractor or subcontractor shall be required to pay the costs 18incurred in collecting such claim.19    All penalties imposed under this Section shall be remitted 20to the Department of Labor and shall be used for the 21administration and enforcement of this Act.22(Source: P.A. 103-48, eff. 1-1-24.)